Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.36.040

Designation of bonds to be signed.

(1) The officer of a code city whose duty it is to cause any bonds to be printed, engraved, or lithographed, shall specify in a written order or requisition to the printer, engraver, or lithographer the number of bonds to be printed, engraved or lithographed and the manner of numbering them.

(2) Every printer, engraver, or lithographer who knowingly prints, engraves, or lithographs a greater number of bonds than that specified or who knowingly prints, engraves, or lithographs more than one bond bearing the same number is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2003 c 53 s 200; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.36.040.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.